Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.090

Transfer of employees and equipment.

(1) All state employees who have exclusively or principally conducted or presided over hearings for state agencies prior to July 1, 1982, shall be transferred to the office.

(2) All state employees who have exclusively or principally served as support staff for those employees transferred under subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the office.

(3) All equipment or other tangible property in possession of state agencies, used or held exclusively or principally by personnel transferred under subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the office unless the office of financial management, in consultation with the head of the agency and the chief administrative law judge, determines that the equipment or property will be more efficiently used by the agency if such property is not transferred.

[ 1981 c 67 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.